Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-117
Village and city of the second class; certified transcript of proceedings; duties of village or city clerk; lost records.

The clerk of any village or city of the second class in which any bonds are issued shall furnish a duly certified transcript to the holder of any bond of any such village or city on demand of such holder, except that if the records of such proceedings have been destroyed by fire or other public calamity, a certified statement of the clerk of all proceedings had prior to the issuance of such bonds shall, when approved by resolution of the city council or village board, have the same force and effect as such certified transcript would have had.

Laws 1885, c. 7, § 3, p. 93;

R.S.1913, § 382;

Laws 1921, c. 191, § 1, p. 709;

C.S.1922, § 299;

C.S.1929, § 11-118;

R.S.1943, § 10-117;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 6.

Certified history of proceedings for issuance of bonds is required. Belza v. Village of Emerson, 159 Neb. 651, 68 N.W.2d 272 (1955).

This section requires city clerk to furnish Auditor of Public Accounts with a certified transcript of all proceedings had previous to the issuance of bonds, and when it appears therefrom that bonds were legally issued for a lawful purpose it is the auditor's duty to register them. State ex rel. City of Tekamah v. Marsh, 108 Neb. 835, 189 N.W. 381 (1922).